New York, session 2025-2026, A8184.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 7 of section 64 of the alcoholic beverage 2 control law is amended by adding a new paragraph (e-17) to read as 3 follows: 4 (e-17) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subdi- 5 vision, the authority may issue a retail license for on-premises 6 consumption for a premises which shall be located within two hundred 7 feet of a building occupied exclusively as a school, church, synagogue 8 or other place of worship, provided such premises constitutes a premises 9 for the sale of food or beverages at retail for consumption on the prem- 10 ises located wholly within the boundaries of the village of Hammonds- 11 port, county of Steuben, bounded and described as follows: 12 ALL THAT TRACT OR PARCEL OF LAND situated in the Village of Hammonds- 13 port, County of Steuben, and State of New York, being bounded and 14 described as follows: commencing at a point on the centerline of Shethar 15 Street, said point also being the northwest corner of lands now or 16 formerly of Jensen and Clark (L 1058/ P 806), thence along lands of said 17 Jensen and Clark S 04°32'09" W a distance of 98.55 feet to a point; 18 thence further along said Jensen and Clark S 10°45'51" W a distance of 19 26.25 feet to a point; thence further along said Jensen and Clark S 20 14°11'46" W a distance of 19.72 feet; thence further along said Jensen 21 and Clark S 09°16'39" W a distance of 34.64 feet to a 5/8" rebar; thence 22 along lands now or formerly of Pennise (L 1137/ P 246 & L 1137/ P 248), 23 N 83°21'00" W a distance of 22.94 feet to a 5/8" rebar; thence along 24 lands now or formerly of Warner (L 998/ P 1000), the following eight EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11862-01-5 A. 8184 2 1 courses and distances for the west line of the ground floor of the prem- 2 ises: 3 1. N 05°03'14" E a distance of 53.23 feet to a point; thence 4 2. N 06°23'07" E a distance of 26.30 feet to a point; thence 5 3. S 84°53'38" E a distance of 8.00 feet to a point; thence 6 4. N 04°39'53" E a distance of 9.75 feet to a point; thence 7 5. N 85°20'07" W a distance of 4.00 feet to a point; thence 8 6. N 04°39'53" E a distance of 11.00 feet to a point; thence 9 7. S 85°20'07" E a distance of 4.00 feet to a point; thence 10 8. N 04°14'32" E a distance of 76.20 feet to a point located on the 11 centerline of Shethar Street and, commencing at the same point as the 12 course number one (No. 1) hereinabove, the following five courses and 13 distances for the west line of the second floor of the premises: 14 1. N 05°03'14" E a distance of 53.23 feet to a point; thence 15 2. N 06°23'07" E a distance of 26.30 feet to a point; thence 16 3. S 84°53'38" E a distance of 8.00 feet to a point; thence 17 4. N 04°39'53" E a distance of 20.75 feet to a point; thence 18 5. N 04°14'32" E a distance of 76.20 feet to a point located on the 19 centerline of Shethar Street, said point being the same centerline point 20 referred to in course number eight (No. 8) hereinabove; thence along the 21 centerline of Shethar Street S 88°52'51" E a distance of 23.00 feet to 22 the point and place of beginning. Containing an area of 0.100 acres. 23 ALL AS MORE FULLY SHOWN on a survey map entitled "Plan of Lands to be 24 Conveyed to 41 Shethar Street, LLC", prepared by Gilbert Land Surveying 25 Services, Job No. GLS-707, dated February 4, 2010, said map to be filed 26 in the Steuben County Clerk's Office contemporaneously herewith. 27 Together with an easement for the use and maintenance of the water 28 pipe or the water main under Shethar Street through the north wall of 29 the premises, immediately adjoining on the west of the premises hereby 30 conveyed, and the connection which then runs through the west cellar 31 wall of the premises hereby conveyed. There is also an easement in 32 connection with the use of soil pipe from toilets across the basement of 33 the building immediately adjoining on the west of the above described 34 premises and running to a cesspool. Together with the easement and right 35 to enter upon the premises immediately adjoining on the west of the 36 above described premises for the purpose of inspecting, repairing, and 37 maintaining adequate water supply from said water main and to the prem- 38 ises hereby conveyed, and also to repair and maintain the soil pipe in 39 the event the adjoining owners fail to do so. The wall now situated on 40 the west side of the premises hereby conveyed which runs north and 41 south, is a party wall, and the maintenance shall be done equally by 42 each adjoining owner. The roof on the entire structure also is consid- 43 ered as a party roof as to that portion which covers the party wall 44 aforesaid. 45 Together with the stairway easement for ingress and egress by means of 46 the stairway in the easterly side of the said premises immediately 47 adjoining on the west of the premises hereby conveyed. 48 Together with the right of way and the right to travel on foot and 49 with teams and vehicles over the alleyway and 12 feet of the right of 50 way leading from Shethar Street and along the west side of the Town 51 Hall, and former Fire House and then easterly along the rear of the 52 buildings to the east line of the premises hereby conveyed. 53 TOGETHER WITH AND SUBJECT TO the rights of the public in and to lands 54 within any public street, any and all easements, oil and gas leases, 55 restrictions and right(s) of way of record, as the same may affect said 56 premises. A. 8184 3 1 BEING THE SAME PREMISES conveyed to the STEVENS LIVING TRUST from 2 James H. Stevens by Deed dated June 9, 2000 and recorded in the Steuben 3 County Clerk's Office on June 12, 2000 in Liber 1662 of Deeds at Page 4 176. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.